Colorado, session 2026A, HB1293.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-40-124.5, amend
(1.7)(b) and (3) as follows:
1-40-124.5. Ballot information booklet.
(1.7) (b) (I) Each person submitting written comments in accordance
with section 1 (7.5)(a)(II) of article V of the state constitution shall provide
his or her THE PERSON'S name and the name of any organization the person
represents or is affiliated with for purposes of making the comments.
(II) The arguments for and against each measure in the EACH
analysis section of the ballot information booklet shall be preceded by the
phrase: "For information on those issue committees that support or oppose
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

the measures on the ballot at the (date and year) election, go to the Colorado
secretary of state's elections center website hyperlink for ballot and
initiative information (appropriate secretary of state website address)."
MUST INCLUDE AN EXPLANATION OF HOW TO ACCESS INFORMATION FROM
THE SECRETARY OF STATE ABOUT ISSUE COMMITTEES THAT SUPPORT OR
OPPOSE THE MEASURES ON THE BALLOT AND THE WEBSITE ADDRESS TO
ACCESS THIS INFORMATION.
(3) (a) There is hereby established in the state treasury the ballot
information publication and distribution revolving fund. Except as
otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (3), Moneys THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY shall be appropriated APPROPRIATE MONEY to the fund
each year by the general assembly in the annual general appropriation act.
All interest earned on the investment of moneys MONEY in the fund shall be
IS credited to the fund. Moneys MONEY in the revolving fund are IS
continuously appropriated to the legislative council of the general assembly
to pay the costs of publishing the text and title of each constitutional
amendment, each initiated or referred measure, or part of a measure, and the
text of a referred or initiated question arising under section 20 of article X
of the state constitution, as defined in section 1-41-102 (3), in at least one
legal publication of general circulation in each county of the state, as
required by section 1-40-124, and the costs of distributing the ballot
information booklet, as required by subsection (2) of this section. Any
moneys MONEY credited to the revolving fund and unexpended at the end
of any given fiscal year shall remain REMAINS in the fund and shall DOES
not revert to the general fund.
(b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys
appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state
government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2007, that are
unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year shall not
revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and
the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution
revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3); except that
the amount so transferred shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys
appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state
government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2008, that are
unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year shall not
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1293

revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and
the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution
revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3).
(d) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any moneys
appropriated from the general fund to the legislative department of the state
government for the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2009, that are
unexpended or not encumbered as of the close of the fiscal year and that are
in excess of the amount of one million forty-two thousand dollars shall not
revert to the general fund and shall be transferred by the state treasurer and
the controller to the ballot information publication and distribution
revolving fund created in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3); except that
the amount so transferred shall not exceed one million one hundred
twenty-nine thousand six hundred seven dollars.
(e) Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (3) to the
contrary, on August 11, 2010, the state treasurer shall deduct one million
one hundred twenty-nine thousand six hundred seven dollars from the ballot
information publication and distribution revolving fund and transfer such
sum to the redistricting account within the legislative department cash fund.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1293

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1293